District of Columbia statutes.
29-602.01

Partnership as entity.

(a)

A partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.

(b)

A limited liability partnership shall continue to be the same entity that existed before the filing of a statement of qualification under § 29-610.01.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 33-102.01.
1981 Ed., § 41-152.1.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 201 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).